nl: Jurk sleep type: Kathedraal; Kapel; Hof; Geen; Koninklijk; Korte sleep/veegsleep; Overige
sv: Typ av släp för klänning: Katedral; Kapell; Hov; Ingen; Kungligt; Svep/borste; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta šlep haljine: Katedrala; Kapela; Dvorska; Nema; Kraljevska; Kratki šlep; Ostalo
es: Tipo de cola de vestido: Catedral; Capilla; Corte; Ninguno; Real; Barrido/cepillo; Otro
sk-SK: Typ vlečky na šatách: Katedrálna; Kaplnková; Dvorová; Žiadna; Kráľovská; Zametacia (krátka); Iné
lt-LT: Suknelės šleifo tipas: Katedros; Koplyčios; Dvaro; Nėra; Karališkas; Šluojantis / liečiantis žemę; Kita
de: Art der Kleiderschleppe: Kathedral-Schleppe; Kapellen-Schleppe; Hofschleppe; Keine; Königliche Schleppe; Pinsel-Schleppe; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de cauda de vestido: Catedral; Capela; Corte; Nenhum; Real; Sweep/escova; Outro
el: Τύπος ουράς φορέματος: Καθεδρικό; Παρεκκλήσι; Αυλή; Κανένα; Βασιλικό; Σκουπάκι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип шлейф за рокля: Катедрален; Параклисен; Придворен; Без; Кралски; Метящ/къс; Друго
th: ประเภทชายลากของชุดเดรส: คาธีดรัล; ชาเปล; คอร์ต; ไม่มี; รอยัล; สวีป/บลัช; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 禮服拖尾類型: 大教堂式; 小教堂式; 宮廷式; 無; 皇家式; 曳地/刷地式; 其他
ko: 드레스 트레인 유형: 캐시드럴; 채플; 코트; 없음; 로열; 스위프/브러시; 기타
vi: Kiểu đuôi váy: Kiểu nhà thờ; Kiểu nhà nguyện; Kiểu cung đình; Không có; Kiểu hoàng gia; Kiểu chổi quét; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de cauda do vestido: Catedral; Capela; Corte; Nenhum; Real; Curta (sweep/brush); Outros
tr: Elbise kuyruk tipi: Katedral; Şapel; Saray; Yok; Kraliyet; Süpüren/Yere değen kuyruk; Diğer
ja: ドレストレインタイプ: カテドラル; チャペル; コート; なし; ロイヤル; スウィープ/ブラシ; その他
zh-CN: 礼服拖尾款式: 大教堂型拖尾; 小教堂型拖尾; 宫廷型拖尾; 无; 皇家型拖尾; 扫地型拖尾; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta obleke z vlakom: Katedralna; Kapelna; Dvorna; Brez; Kraljevska; Kratka vlečka (Sweep/Brush); Drugo
nb: Kjolesleptype: Katedral; Kapell; Hoff; Ingen; Konge; Kortslep (sweep); Annet
pl: Typ trenu sukienki: Katedralny; Kapliczny; Dworski; Brak; Królewski; Tradycyjny/Sweep; Inne
cs: Typ vlečky šatů: Katedrální; Kaplová; Dvorní; Žádné; Královská; Krátká (sweep); Jiné
da: Type slæb på kjolen: Katedral; Kapel; Hof; Ingen; Royal; Fejende; Andet
fr: Type de traîne de robe: Cathédrale; Chapelle; Cour; Aucune; Royale; Balai; Autre
ru: Тип шлейфа платья: Соборный; Часовня; Придворный; Без шлейфа; Королевский; Подметающий/касающийся; Другое
fi: Mekon laahustyyppi: Katedraalilaahus; Kappelilaahus; Hovilaahus; Ei mitään; Kuninkaallinen; Lakaiseva; Muu
hu: Ruhaujj típusa: Katedrális; Kápolna; Udvari; Nincs; Királyi; Seprő/kefélő; Egyéb
it: Tipo di strascico: A cattedrale; A cappella; A corte; Nessuno; Reale; A terra; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul trenei rochiei: Catedrală; Capelă; Curte; Fără; Regală; Scurtă (sweep/brush); Altele
en: Dress train type: Cathedral; Chapel; Court; None; Royal; Sweep/Brush; Other